Georgia, session 2025_26, SB117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1 of Title 45 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions regarding public officers and employees, is amended by revising Code
Section 45-1-4, relating to complaints or information from public employees as to fraud,
waste, and abuse in state programs and operations, as follows:
"45-1-4.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Government agency' means any agency of federal, state, or local government
charged with the enforcement of laws, rules, or regulations.
- 1 -

LC 60 0112S
(2) 'Law, rule, or regulation' includes any federal, state, or local statute or ordinance or
any rule or regulation adopted according to any federal, state, or local statute or
ordinance.
(3) 'Public employee' means any person who is employed by the executive, judicial, or
legislative branch of the state or by any other department, board, bureau, commission,
authority, or other agency of the state. Such This term also includes all employees,
officials, and administrators of any agency covered by the rules of the State Personnel
Board and any local or regional governmental entity that receives any funds from the
State of Georgia or any state agency.
(4) 'Public employer' means the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of the state; any
other department, board, bureau, commission, authority, or other agency of the state
which employs or appoints a public employee or public employees; or any local or
regional governmental entity that receives any funds from the State of Georgia or any
state agency.
(5) 'Retaliate' or 'retaliation' refers to the discharge, suspension, or demotion by a public
employer of a public employee or any other adverse employment action taken by a public
employer against a public employee in the terms or conditions of employment for
disclosing a violation of or noncompliance with a law, rule, or regulation to either a
supervisor or government agency.
(6) 'Supervisor' means any individual:
(A) To whom a public employer has given authority to direct and control the work
performance of the affected public employee;
(B) To whom a public employer has given authority to take corrective action regarding
a violation of or noncompliance with a law, rule, or regulation of which the public
employee complains; or
(C) Who has been designated by a public employer to receive complaints regarding a
violation of or noncompliance with a law, rule, or regulation.
- 2 -

LC 60 0112S
(b) A public employer may receive and investigate complaints or information from any
public employee concerning the possible existence of any activity constituting fraud, waste,
and abuse in or relating to any state programs and operations under the jurisdiction of such
public employer.
(c) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, such public employer shall not after
receipt of a complaint or information from a public employee disclose the identity of the
public employee without the written consent of such public employee, unless the public
employer determines such disclosure is necessary and unavoidable during the course of the
investigation. In such event, the public employee shall be notified in writing at least seven
days prior to such disclosure.
(d)(1) No public employer shall make, adopt, or enforce any policy or practice
preventing a public employee from disclosing a violation of or noncompliance with a law,
rule, or regulation to either a supervisor or a government agency.
(2) No public employer shall retaliate against a public employee for disclosing a
violation of or noncompliance with a law, rule, or regulation to either a supervisor or a
government agency, unless the disclosure was made with knowledge that the disclosure
was false or with reckless disregard for its truth or falsity.
(3) No public employer shall retaliate against a public employee for objecting to, or
refusing to participate in, any activity, policy, or practice of the public employer that the
public employee has reasonable cause to believe is in violation of or noncompliance with
a law, rule, or regulation.
(4) Paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection shall not apply to policies or practices
which implement, or to actions by public employers against public employees who
violate, privilege or confidentiality obligations recognized by constitutional, statutory, or
common law.
(e)(1) A public employee who has been the object of retaliation in violation of this Code
section may institute a civil action in superior court for relief as set forth in paragraph (2)
- 3 -

LC 60 0112S
of this subsection within one year after discovering the retaliation or within three years
after the retaliation, whichever is earlier.
(2) In any action brought pursuant to this subsection, the court may order any or all of
the following relief:
(A) An injunction restraining continued violation of this Code section;
(B) Reinstatement of the employee to the same position held before the retaliation or
to an equivalent position;
(C) Reinstatement of full fringe benefits and seniority rights;
(D) Compensation for lost wages, benefits, and other remuneration; and
(E) Any other compensatory damages allowable at law.
(f) A court may shall award reasonable attorney's fees, court costs, and expenses to a
prevailing public employee.
(g) Any agent of a public employer who violates subsection (d) of this Code section shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 4 -